California, session 20252026, AB2449.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Children are most vulnerable while loading or unloading at the curb. Despite Section 22454 of the Vehicle Code, illegal passing persists statewide.(b) Data from the National Association of State Directors of Pupil Transportation Services shows tens of thousands of illegal passings in a single day across participating states.(c) At least 27 states authorize camera enforcement of schoolbus stop-arm violations. California should adopt a privacy protective and civil framework for their system.(d) California has a proven civil automated enforcement model and precedent for historical camera enforcement, as well as automated license plate recognition privacy law, that demonstrate how to balance, safety, privacy, and due process.SEC. 2. Section 22454 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:22454. (a) The driver of any vehicle, upon meeting or overtaking, from either direction, any schoolbus equipped with signs as required in this code, that is stopped for the purpose of loading or unloading any schoolchildren and displays a flashing red light signal and stop signal arm, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 25257, if equipped with a stop signal arm, visible from front or rear, shall bring the vehicle to a stop immediately before passing the schoolbus and shall not proceed past the schoolbus until the flashing red light signal and stop signal arm, if equipped with a stop signal arm, cease operation.(b) (1) The driver of a vehicle upon a divided highway or multiple-lane highway need not stop upon meeting or passing a schoolbus that is upon the other roadway.(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, a multiple-lane highway is any highway that has two or more lanes of travel in each direction.(c) (1) If a vehicle was observed overtaking a schoolbus in violation of subdivision (a), and the driver of the schoolbus witnessed the violation, the driver may, within 24 hours, report the violation and furnish the vehicle license plate number and description and the time and place of the violation to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction of the offense. That law enforcement agency shall issue a letter of warning prepared in accordance with paragraph (2) with respect to the alleged violation to the registered owner of the vehicle. The issuance of a warning letter under this paragraph shall not be entered on the driving record of the person to whom it is issued, issued but does not preclude the imposition of any other applicable penalty.(2) The Attorney General shall prepare and furnish to every law enforcement agency in the state a form letter for purposes of paragraph (1), and the law enforcement agency may issue those letters in the exact form prepared by the Attorney General. The Attorney General may charge a fee to any law enforcement agency that requests a copy of the form letter to recover the costs of preparing and providing that copy.(d) This section also applies to a roadway upon private property.(e) A violation of this section is not a crime and is not considered a moving violation for the purpose of assessing points pursuant to Section 12810.5. Imposition of a civil penalty pursuant to Section 22454.6 does not constitute a conviction, shall not be made a part of the driving record of the person upon whom the liability is imposed, and shall not be used for any purposes in the provision of motor vehicle insurance.(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 22454 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:22454. (a) The driver of any vehicle, upon meeting or overtaking, from either direction, any schoolbus equipped with signs, as required in this code, that is stopped for the purpose of loading or unloading any schoolchildren and displays a flashing red light signal and stop signal arm, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 25257, if equipped with a stop signal arm, visible from front or rear, shall bring the vehicle to a stop immediately before passing the schoolbus and shall not proceed past the schoolbus until the flashing red light signal and stop signal arm, if equipped with a stop signal arm, cease operation.(b) (1) The driver of a vehicle upon a divided highway or multiple-lane highway need not stop upon meeting or passing a schoolbus that is upon the other roadway.(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, a multiple-lane highway is any highway that has two or more lanes of travel in each direction.(c) (1) If a vehicle was observed overtaking a schoolbus in violation of subdivision (a), and the driver of the schoolbus witnessed the violation, the driver may, within 24 hours, report the violation and furnish the vehicle license plate number and description and the time and place of the violation to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction of the offense. That law enforcement agency shall issue a letter of warning prepared in accordance with paragraph (2) with respect to the alleged violation to the registered owner of the vehicle. The issuance of a warning letter under this paragraph shall not be entered on the driving record of the person to whom it is issued but does not preclude the imposition of any other applicable penalty.(2) The Attorney General shall prepare and furnish to every law enforcement agency in the state a form letter for purposes of paragraph (1), and the law enforcement agency may issue those letters in the exact form prepared by the Attorney General. The Attorney General may charge a fee to any law enforcement agency that requests a copy of the form letter to recover the costs of preparing and providing that copy.(d) This section also applies to a roadway upon private property.(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2032.SEC. 4. Section 22454.3 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:22454.3. (a) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Schoolbus” has the same definition as in subdivision (a) of Section 545.(2) “Stop signal arm enforcement system” means a camera system affixed to the outside of a schoolbus with two or more camera sensors or computers that produce recorded video and two or more film or digital photographic still images for the purpose of documenting the rear license plate of a motor vehicle being used or operated in a manner that allegedly violates Section 22454.(b) A school district may install and operate a stop signal arm enforcement system on a schoolbus for the purpose of enforcing Section 22454. The school district shall post a warning sign or sticker on all schoolbuses in which a system is installed and operational indicating the use of the system.(c) The school district may contract with a private vendor or manufacturer to provide a stop signal arm enforcement system on each bus within its fleet, whether owned, contracted, or leased, and for services, including, but not limited to, the operation and maintenance of the system. The rate of the contract shall be mutually agreed to by the parties, and monetary obligations to the private vendor or manufacturer arising out of the contract shall be fulfilled solely from penalties allocated to the school district pursuant to Section 22454.5. Under no circumstances shall the monetary value of the contract between the school district and a private vendor or manufacturer for stop signal arm enforcement system services exceed the revenues generated by those penalties. The school district shall post on its internet website the contract price for an agreement between the vendor and the school district.(d) Each school district, private manufacturer, or vendor shall, within 30 days after an alleged violation is captured, submit all of the following information to a law enforcement agency authorized to enforce violations of Section 22454:(1) A copy of the recorded image showing the motor vehicle.(2) The license plate number and state of issuance of the motor vehicle.(3) The date, time, and place of the alleged violation.(e) A law enforcement agency authorized to enforce violations of Section 22454 shall review the information submitted by the school district, private manufacturer, or vendor pursuant to subdivision (d) to determine whether there is sufficient evidence that a violation of Section 22454 occurred and, if the evidence shows a violation occurred, shall certify a notice of violation.(f) Upon request by the law enforcement agency, the school district shall provide written documentation that the stop signal arm enforcement system was operating correctly at the time of the alleged violation.(g) A citation based on inspection of recorded images produced by a stop signal arm enforcement system and sworn to or affirmed by a peace officer authorized to enforce violations of Section 22454 shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it. A recorded image evidencing a violation of Section 22454 shall be admissible in any judicial or administrative proceeding to adjudicate the liability for the violation. A rebuttable presumption shall exist that the registered owner of the motor vehicle was the driver at the time of the alleged violation.(h) Within 30 days after receiving the information provided pursuant to subdivision (d), a law enforcement agency authorized to enforce violations of Section 22454 shall send by first-class mail a notice of violation to the registered owner of the motor vehicle involved in the violation. Mailing the notice of violation constitutes notification. In the case of joint ownership of a motor vehicle, the notice of violation shall be mailed to the first name appearing on the registration. However, if the first name appearing on the registration is a business entity, the second name appearing on the registration may be used.(i) The notice of violation shall include all of the following:(1) A copy of the recorded image showing the motor vehicle involved in the violation.(2) A citation for the violation indicating the date, time, and location of the alleged violation.(3) The amount of the civil penalty and the date by which the penalty shall be paid.(4) Instructions on how to request a hearing to contest liability or notice.(5) A warning that failure to pay the civil penalty or to contest liability within 30 days after the notice is mailed shall waive the right to contest liability.(j) The owner of the motor vehicle involved in a violation may admit responsibility for the violation and pay the fine as indicated on the notice of violation. Payment of the fine operates as a final disposition of the civil penalty.(k) (1) Within 30 days after personal delivery or mailing of the notice descried in subdivision (h), the contestant may seek review by filing an appeal to the superior court, where the case shall be heard de novo, except that the contents of the processing agency’s file in the case on appeal shall be lodged by the designated agency at the designated agency’s expense and be received into evidence. A copy of the notice shall be admitted into evidence as prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the notice. A copy of the notice of appeal shall be served in person or by certified first-class mail with return receipt upon the processing agency by the appellant. For purposes of computing the 30-day period, Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be applicable. A proceeding pursuant to this subdivision is a limited civil case.(2) The fee for filing the notice of appeal shall be as provided in Section 70615 of the Government Code. Upon receipt of the notice of appeal, the designated jurisdiction shall lodge its administrative record for the case with the court within 15 calendar days. The court shall notify the appellant of the appearance date by mail or personal delivery. The court shall retain the fee pursuant to Section 70615 of the Government Code regardless of the outcome of the appeal. If the appellant prevails, this fee and any payment of the civil penalty shall be promptly refunded by the issuing agency in accordance with the judgment of the court.(3) The conduct of the hearing on appeal pursuant to this section is a subordinate judicial duty that may be performed by a commissioner or other subordinate judicial officer at the direction of the president judge of the court.(4) If a notice of appeal of the examiner’s decision is not filed within the period set forth in this subdivision, the decision shall be deemed final.(5) If the civil penalty has not been paid and the final decision is adverse to the appellant, the processing agency may, promptly after the decision becomes final, proceed to collect the civil penalty pursuant to this section.(l) If a violation has not been contested and the civil penalty has not been paid within 30 days after a notice is mailed pursuant to subdivision (h), the law enforcement agency shall send by first-class mail a final notice of the unpaid civil penalty. The final notice shall inform the owner that the law enforcement agency shall notify the department if the civil penalty is not paid within 30 days after the final notice was mailed and that notice shall result in the nonrenewal of the registration of the motor vehicle and prohibit the title transfer of the motor vehicle within this state.(m) A notice sent to the department pursuant to subdivision (l) shall include all of the following:(1) Any information known or available to the law enforcement agency concerning the motor vehicle’s license plate number and year of registration and the name of the registered owner of the motor vehicle.(2) The date on which the violation occurred.(3) The dates on which the required notice and final notice were mailed.(4) The seal, logo, emblem, or electronic seal of the law enforcement agency.(n) Within five days after receipt of a notice described in subdivision (m), the department shall enter the notice into the department’s motor vehicle database and shall refuse to renew the registration of the motor vehicle and prohibit the title transfer of the motor vehicle within this state until the civil penalty is paid.(o) The department shall send the registered owner of the motor vehicle by first-class mail a notice stating all of the following:(1) That the registration of the motor vehicle involved in the violation cannot be renewed within this state.(2) That the title of the motor vehicle involved in the violation cannot be transferred within this state.(3) That the penalties are being imposed due to failure to pay the civil penalty for a violation of Section 22454 as provided in this section.(4) The procedure provided in subdivision (p) for removing the penalties.(p) The department shall remove the restrictions imposed pursuant to subdivision (n) when the registered owner of the motor vehicle or any other person presents the department with adequate proof that the civil penalty has been paid or otherwise adjudicated.(q) The owner of a motor vehicle is not responsible for a violation of Section 22454 cited pursuant to this section if the vehicle involved was reported to a state or local law enforcement agency as stolen at the time of the violation.(r) Notwithstanding any other law, equipment deployed as part of a stop signal arm enforcement system as provided under this section shall be incapable of automated or user-controlled remote surveillance by means of recorded video or still images. Recorded images collected as part of the stop signal arm enforcement system may only be used to document violations of Section 22454 and shall not be used for any other surveillance purposes, including, but not limited to, employee surveillance or discipline. To the extent practicable, a stop signal arm enforcement system shall use necessary technology to ensure that recorded video or still images produced by the system do not identify the driver, any passenger, or the contents of a motor vehicle. A notice of a violation of Section 22454 issued pursuant to this section shall not be dismissed solely because a recorded video or still images allow for the identification of the driver, any passenger, or the contents of a motor vehicle as long as a reasonable effort has been made to comply with this subdivision.(s) Any recorded video or still image obtained through the use of a stop signal arm enforcement system shall be destroyed within 90 days after the final disposition of the recorded event. The vendor of a stop signal arm enforcement system shall provide the school district with written notice by December 31 of each year that these records have been destroyed in accordance with this section.(t) Notwithstanding any other law, registered motor vehicle owner information obtained as a result of the operation of a stop signal arm enforcement system is not the property of the manufacturer or vendor of the system and may be used only for the purposes of this section. Notwithstanding any other law, photographic records made by a stop signal arm enforcement system shall be confidential, and shall be made available only to governmental agencies and law enforcement agencies and only for the purposes of this section. Photographic records made by a stop signal arm enforcement system shall not be sold for any purpose. A school district may provide photographic records to law enforcement or governmental agencies for education or training of law enforcement or vehicle operators. A law enforcement or governmental agency that receives photographic records for education or training purposes shall redact license plates and any other identifying information, including, but not limited to, an individual’s face. Confidential information obtained from the department for the administration or enforcement of this section shall be held confidential, and shall not be used for any other purpose.(u) (1) By July 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, a school district operating a stop signal arm enforcement system shall provide a summary report, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Governor, the Legislature, and the department regarding the use and operation of the system under this section, including the number of citations issued and the amount of funds collected for the preceding state fiscal year.(2) A school district operating a stop signal arm enforcement system shall do all of the following:(A) Adopt a use policy and impact report at a public meeting prior to deployment of the system.(B) Post the new route or new operational hours and camera locations on their internet website prior to deployment of the system.(C) Publish annual metrics for citations, dismissals, rates for repeat offenders, complaints, crash trends near stops, revenue from implementation of the system, and the uses of the revenue from the system.(v) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, a stop signal arm enforcement system shall meet specifications established by the State Board of Education and shall be tested at regular intervals according to specifications prescribed by state board rule. The state board shall establish the specifications by rule on or before January 1, 2028. However, any equipment acquired by purchase, lease, or other arrangement under an agreement entered into by a school district on or before January 1, 2028, or equipment used to enforce violations of Section 22454 on or before January 1, 2028, is not required to meet the specifications established by the state board.(w) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to address student privacy concerns that may arise from the use of a stop signal arm enforcement system.(x) Installation or operation of a stop signal arm enforcement system on a schoolbus does not preclude a schoolbus driver from reporting a violation of Section 22454 pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 22454.(y) (1) A school district shall incorporate a regular review and attestation of the proper functioning of a stop signal arm enforcement system into its routine procedures for ensuring a schoolbus’ safeworthiness.(2) If a district and a union representing classified employees agree that new duties shall be imposed on the employees pursuant to this section, the district shall provide training on those new duties, which shall take place during the schoolday and the employees shall be compensated for their time at their regular rate of pay for attending the training.(z) A driver of a schoolbus equipped with a stop signal arm enforcement system shall not incur any increased liability or be liable for the operation of that system.(aa) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 5. Section 22454.5 of the Vehicle Code is repealed.22454.5.Notwithstanding Section 42001, a person convicted of a first violation of Section 22454 shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) or more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250). A person convicted of a second separate violation of Section 22454 shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). If a person is convicted of a third or subsequent violation of Section 22454 and the offense occurred within three years of two or more separate violations of Section 22454, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall suspend the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle for one year.SEC. 6. Section 22454.5 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:22454.5. (a) All violations of Section 22454 shall be punished pursuant to Section 22454.6.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), during the first 60 calendar days of enforcement pursuant to the program described in 22454.3, including new routes in a jurisdiction, the designated jurisdiction shall issue warning notices rather than notices of violation for violations of Section 22454 detected by the signal arm enforcement system. After the 60-calendar-day enforcement period for the program, the penalties in Section 22454.6 shall apply.(c) A violation of Section 22454 detected by a law enforcement agency in the designated jurisdiction shall apply the penalties in Section 22454.6 without first issuing the warning notices described in subdivision (a).(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 7. Section 22454.5 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:22454.5. (a) Notwithstanding Section 42001, a person convicted of a first violation of Section 22454 shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) or more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250). A person convicted of a second separate violation of Section 22454 shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). If a person is convicted of a third or subsequent violation of Section 22454 and the offense occurred within three years of two or more separate violations of Section 22454, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall suspend the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle for one year.(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2032.SEC. 8. Section 22454.6 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:22454.6. (a) A person’s first violation of Section 22454 shall be punished by a civil penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250).(b) A person’s second and any subsequent violation of Section 22454 shall be punished by a civil penalty of five hundred dollars ($500).(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 9. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 4 of this act, which adds Section 22454.3 of the Vehicle Code, imposes a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:To protect privacy interests of persons who are issued notices of violation under a stop signal arm enforcement system program, and the privacy interests of students captured in camera footage, the Legislature finds and declares that the photographic or administrative records generated by the program shall be confidential, and shall be made available only to alleged violators and to governmental agencies solely for the purpose of enforcing these violations and assessing the impact of the use of the systems, as required by this act.